Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2621YH (2) 91 cm/jh H.F. 817 Section 1. Section 633.356, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Child support services, as created 3 in section 252B.2, shall make available a form meeting 4 the requirements of this subsection that may be used, if 5 appropriate, by a successor as defined in subsection 2, 6 paragraph âaâ or âbâ , when child support services or the 7 collection services center, as created in section 252B.13A, 8 is the holder of the decedentâs property in the form of 9 undistributed child support owed to the decedent. 10